Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB517.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1510 of Title 75 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 1510. Issuance and content of driver's license.* * *(a.2) Autism spectrum disorder designation.--(1) An individual who is diagnosed with an autism spectrum disorder may request to have a notation of the diagnosis placed on the individual's driver's license or identification card under subsection (b) . The individual must present the department with a sworn statement from a qualified medical professional licensed in this Commonwealth verifying the diagnosis. By submitting the request, the individual consents for the department to make public the 123456789101112131415161718 diagnosis on the individual's driver's license or identification card.(2) A parent or guardian of an individual under 18 years of age or under guardianship may request the notation provided under this subsection to be placed on the individual's driver's license or identification card. The parent or guardian must comply with all of the requirements under paragraph (1).(3) The department shall promulgate regulations necessary to administer this subsection.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0517PN0510 - 2 - 123456789101112